Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-542
Service of process; applicability.

Unless specifically provided to the contrary or the context otherwise requires, the provisions of Chapter 25, article 5, on service of process, as such provisions may from time to time be amended, shall apply to all civil proceedings in all courts of this state and to all proceedings under any statute which refers to or incorporates the general provisions on process or service of process.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 37.